Utah statutes.
78A-7-108.   Justice court judge to collect fees before filing action -- Penalty.

Every justice court judge who files in his office any complaint, or allows a civil action to be commenced in his court, without the fees being paid in advance, except in cases permitted by law, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

